finished/cpa.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [PST] [FUT] [PRS] [IPFV] [IRR] [PL] [SG] [1] [2] [3] @U.Tense.PST@ @U.Tense.PRS@ @U.Tense.FUT@ 13E 12E X1E X2E X3E 1M 3M
 
LEXICON Root

Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix

@U.Tense.PST@:@U.Tense.PST@mi³-     Lemma;
@U.Tense.PRS@:@U.Tense.PRS@0          Lemma;
@U.Tense.FUT@:@U.Tense.FUT@0          Lemma;

LEXICON Lemma
!!CLASS 1
bēn¹²     Class1;
chi²+kián²     Class1;
chi²+ngió²     Class1;
chi²+ngiú²     Class1;
chión²     Class1;
chionɁ¹²     Class1;
chiú²     Class1;
chiúgɁ²     Class1;
dsēn¹²     Class1;
dsúgɁ²     Class1;
guian¹²     Class1;
guión²     Class1;
guiónɁ²     Class1;
sianɁ¹²     Class1;
tsog¹²     Class1;

!!CLASS 2
chiángɁ¹²   Class2;
dsiog¹²     Class2;
guen¹²     Class2;
hmóɁ¹²     Class2;
hngiángɁ¹²     Class2;
hngie¹²     Class2;
ngái¹²     Class2;
ngøɁ¹²     Class2;
rǿnɁ¹²     Class2;
siág¹²     Class2;
ti²+dsiog¹     Class2;
ti²+dso¹     Class2;
tiu¹²     Class2;
ɁagɁ²     Class2;
ɁiúɁ¹²     Class2;
ɁløaɁ¹²     Class2;
Ɂméi¹²     Class2;
Ɂuø¹²     Class2;

!!CLASS 3
bø²+hmé²     Class3;
bø²+lḗnɁ²     Class3;
tión²     Class3;
ɁéɁ²     Class3;
ɁmíɁ²     Class3;

!!CLASS 4 (guesser)

!!CLASS 5
huu¹²     Class5;

!!CLASS 6
bán²     Class6;
bén²     Class6;
bḗn²     Class6;
bí²     Class6;
búɁ²     Class6;
ngǿi²     Class6;
nió²     Class6;
nǿɁ²     Class6;
pø²+hánɁ²     Class6;
séi²     Class6;
téiɁ²     Class6;
tií²     Class6;
tiú²     Class6;
tiúg²     Class6;
tǿɁ²     Class6;
tsánɁ²     Class6;
tsǿng²     Class6;
ɁánɁ²     Class6;
Ɂén²     Class6;
Ɂéng²     Class6;
Ɂí²     Class6;
ɁiánɁ²     Class6;
ɁiíɁ²     Class6;
Ɂlí²     Class6;
ɁmóɁ²     Class6;
ɁóɁ²     Class6;
Ɂúg²     Class6;

!!CLASS 7
huúɁ²     Class7;
tangɁ²    Class7;

!!CLASS 8
búɁ¹²     Class8;
nēɁ¹²     Class8;
ɁéɁ¹²     Class8;
Ɂia¹²     Class8;
Ɂian²     Class8;
Ɂmóng¹²     Class8;

!!CLASS 9
chiogɁ¹²     Class9;
dsan²     Class9;
gógɁ¹²     Class9;
guái²     Class9;
guianɁ¹²     Class9;
guiugɁ²     Class9;
guø¹²     Class9;
guønɁ¹²     Class9;
ngēɁ²     Class9;
niá¹²     Class9;
nioɁ²     Class9;
niuɁ³     Class9;
rain¹²     Class9;
rónɁ¹²     Class9;
tan¹²     Class9;
tanɁ²     Class9;
tióɁ¹²     Class9;
tsø²+han¹²     Class9;
tsog²     Class9;
tsogɁ²     Class9;
tson¹²     Class9;
tsón¹²     Class9;
tson²     Class9;
u²+Ɂai¹²     Class9;
Ɂien²     Class9;
Ɂiog²     Class9;
ɁlianɁ²     Class9;
ɁlogɁ²     Class9;
Ɂog¹²     Class9;

!!CLASS 10
chióg¹²     Class10;


!!Class 11
ɁēnɁ¹²    Class11;


!!Class 12
chiag¹²     Class12;
dsiag¹²     Class12;
dsie¹²     Class12;
ngáɁ¹²     Class12;
ngó¹²     Class12;
ngøa¹²     Class12;
nié¹²     Class12;
nøɁ¹²     Class12;
rang¹²     Class12;
tag¹²     Class12;
tei¹²     Class12;
teng¹²     Class12;
tieɁ¹²     Class12;
tógɁ¹²     Class12;
tsá¹²     Class12;
tsēn¹²     Class12;
tsiɁ¹²     Class12;
tso¹²     Class12;
Ɂai¹²     Class12;
Ɂe¹²     Class12;
Ɂiei¹²     Class12;
ɁiéiɁ¹²     Class12;
Ɂio¹²     Class12;
ɁliágɁ¹²     Class12;
ɁlieɁ¹²     Class12;
ɁliuɁ¹²     Class12;
ɁnáiɁ¹²     Class12;
Ɂngieng¹²     Class12;
Ɂngiéng¹²     Class12;
Ɂøa¹²     Class12;

!!CLASS 13
dsian¹²     Class13;
dsióɁ¹²% hǿg³:dsióɁ¹²   Class13;
guiágɁ¹²     Class13;
guiánɁ¹²     Class13;
guiúnɁ¹²     Class13;
guǿn¹²     Class13;
tán¹²     Class13;
tiánɁ¹²     Class13;
tion¹²     Class13;
tsǿɁ¹²     Class13;
Ɂien¹²     Class13;
Ɂiog¹²     Class13;
ɁioɁ¹²     Class13;
ɁnáɁ¹²     Class13;
Ɂnē¹²     Class13;
ɁnióɁ¹²     Class13;
ɁnóɁ¹²     Class13;

!!CLASS 14 - all 3s
ɁúgɁ²      Class14;
ɁónɁ²      Class14;
Ɂnie¹²     Class14;

!!CLASS 15 - all 13s
ɁuǿɁ¹²     Class15;
Ɂug¹²      Class15;
Ɂuan¹²     Class15;
Ɂnia¹²     Class15;
ɁlanɁ¹²    Class15;
Ɂiá¹²      Class15;
ɁenɁ¹²     Class15;


!!CLASS 15

!!CLASS 16

!!CLASS 17

!!CLASS 18
rón²     Class18;
sián²     Class18;
ti²+dsǿ²     Class18;
ti²+li¹     Class18;

!!CLASS 18.5
siúg²     Class18.5;
tai²     Class18.5;
tsanɁ¹²     Class18.5;
tsén²     Class18.5;
tsø²+nióɁ²     Class18.5;
tsón²     Class18.5;
ɁónɁ²     Class18.5;



LEXICON Class1
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:13EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:13EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:13EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:13EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:13EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:13EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:13EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:13E3M          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:13E1MA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13E1MA     End3;

LEXICON Class2
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X3EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X3EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;

LEXICON Class3
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:A         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:A          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3E1MA     End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:3M          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3E1MA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:X3E1MA     End3;

LEXICON Class5
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X3EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X3EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:12E              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:12E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:12EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA       End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:A            End3;

LEXICON Class6
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:12EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:12EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:12E              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:12E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:12EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:12EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:13EA        End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:0          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class7
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X2EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X2EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:X2E              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:X2E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:12EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:12EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA        End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X2E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class8
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:A         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:A          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:13EA        End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X1EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class9
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:A         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:A            End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X1EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X1EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:X1EA     End3;

LEXICON Class10
[V][IPFV][PRS][2]:12EA          End2;
[V][IPFV][PST][2]:A            End1;
[V][IPFV][PRS][3]:12E              End2;
[V][IPFV][PST][3]:12E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS][1]:12A     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][PST][1]:12A     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS][1]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][PST][1]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IRR][FUT][2]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][FUT][3]:X1E        End3;
[V][IRR][PL][FUT][1]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][FUT][1]:X3EA     End3;

LEXICON Class11
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X2EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X2EA          End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:A        End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:A     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;

LEXICON Class12
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X2EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X2EA       End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X2EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X2EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class13
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:12EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:12EA         End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:12E             End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:12E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:12EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:12EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:12EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:12EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:13EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X1E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class14 (all 3s)
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X3EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X3EA       End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:X3E              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:X3E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:X3E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;

LEXICON Class15 (all 13s)
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:13EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:13EA       End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:13E              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:13E              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:13EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:13EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:13EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:13EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:13EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:13E          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class18
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X3EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X3EA       End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:A     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:A     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:0          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;

LEXICON Class18.5
[V][IPFV][2][PRS]:X3EA         End2;
[V][IPFV][2][PST]:X3EA       End1;
[V][IPFV][3][PRS]:0              End2;
[V][IPFV][3][PST]:0              End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PRS]:X3EA     End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][1][PST]:X3EA     End1;
[V][IRR][2][FUT]:X3EA          End3;
[V][IRR][3][FUT]:0          End3;
[V][IRR][PL][1][FUT]:X3EA     End3;
[V][IRR][SG][1][FUT]:13EA     End3;


LEXICON End1
@U.Tense.PST@               #;

LEXICON End2
@U.Tense.PRS@               #;

LEXICON End3
@U.Tense.FUT@               #;
